Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-511
State Board of Education; districts; terms; qualifications; nonpartisan ballot.

The State of Nebraska is divided into eight districts for the election of the State Board of Education as provided and described in sections 79-311 and 79-312. One member from district number one, one member from district number two, one member from district number three, and one member from district number four shall be elected at the statewide general election in 1996 and each four years thereafter. One member from district number five, one member from district number six, one member from district number seven, and one member from district number eight shall be elected at the statewide general election in 1994 and each four years thereafter. The members shall serve for terms of four years or until their successors are elected and qualified. Candidates for the State Board of Education shall meet the qualifications found in section 79-313. The members shall be elected on the nonpartisan ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 107;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1038;

Laws 2001, LB 856, § 1.